Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1242
Bridges; injury to public ways, works, or utilities; repair.

Any public ways or public works, including those of a metropolitan utilities district, damaged or destroyed by reason of the construction of a bridge or approaches as provided in sections 14-1201 to 14-1252 shall be restored or repaired by or at the expense of the bridge commission created by a city of the metropolitan class and placed in their original condition as near as practicable, or, at the option of the owner of such property, such property may be repaired or restored by the owner and the bridge commission shall reimburse the owner for the reasonable cost of such repair or restoration.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 20, p. 628;

C.S.1929, § 14-1220;

R.S.1943, § 14-1242;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 275.